NO.6 CRANKS NORMALLY BUT WILL NOT START [MZ-CD 1.6 (Y6)]


id0103b3801200

6

CRANKS NORMALLY BUT WILL NOT START

DESCRIPTION
•  The starter cranks the engine at normal speed but the engine will not run.
•  Refer to symptom troubleshooting “No.5 Engine stalls” if this symptom appears after engine stall.
•  Fuel is in the fuel tank.
•  Battery is normal.
POSSIBLE CAUSE
•  Poor fuel quality
•  Intake-air system restriction
•  Fuel line restriction
•  EGR system malfunction
•  Glow system malfunction
•  Fuel pressure sensor or related circuit malfunction
•  Fuel metering valve malfunction
•  Fuel pressure limiter malfunction
•  Fuel leakage
•  Fuel filter clogging
•  Incorrect fuel injection timing
•  Fuel warmer system malfunction
•  Erratic signal from CKP sensor
•  Erratic signal from CMP sensor
•  V-reference supply circuit malfunction
•  ECT sensor or related circuit malfunction
•  Supply pump malfunction
•  Fuel injector malfunction
•  Immobilizer system and/or circuit malfunction (Vehicles with immobilizer system)
•  Immobilizer system operating properly. (Engine key is not programmed.) (Vehicles with immobilizer system)
•  Low engine compression
•  Improper valve timing
•  PCM control repay malfunction
Предупреждение
The following troubleshooting flow chart contains the fuel system diagnosis and repair procedures. Read the following warnings before servicing the fuel system:
•  Fuel vapor is hazardous. It can easily ignite, causing serious injury and damage. Always keep sparks and flames away from fuel.
•  Fuel line spills and leakage are dangerous. Fuel can ignite and cause serious injury or death and damage. Fuel can also irritate skin and eyes. To prevent this, always complete “BEFORE REPAIR PROCEDURE” and “AFTER REPAIR PROCEDURE” described in this manual.

Diagnostic Procedure

STEP

INSPECTION

RESULTS

ACTION

1
Примечание
•  The following test should be performed for vehicles with the immobilizer system. Go to Step 7 for vehicles without the immobilizer system.
Connect the M-MDS to the DLC-2.
Do the following conditions appear?
•  Engine does not crank.
•  DTC P1260 is displayed.
Yes
Both conditions appear:
Go to Step 4.
No
Either or other condition appears:
Go to the next step.
2
Is the coil connector securely connected to the coil?
Yes
Go to the next step.
No
Connect the coil connector securely.
Return to Step 1.
3
Does the security light illuminate?
Yes
Go to the next step.
No
Inspect the instrument cluster and wiring harness.
4
Connect the M-MDS to the DLC-2 and retrieve the DTCs.
DTC
B1213, B1600, B1601, B1602, B1681, B2103, B2139, B2141, B2431,U2510
Yes
Go to the appropriate DTC test.
No
Go to the next step.
5
Inspect the following wiring harnesses and connectors:
•  Between coil terminal A and instrument cluster terminal 2Q
•  Between coil terminal B and instrument cluster terminal 2S
Is there any malfunction?
Yes
Repair or replace the suspected wiring harness and connector.
No
Go to the next step.
6
Inspect the following wiring harnesses and connectors:
•  Between PCM terminal 309 and instrument cluster terminal 1I
•  Between PCM terminal 301 and instrument cluster terminal 1K
Is there any malfunction?
Yes
Repair or replace the suspected wiring harness and connector.
No
Go to the next step.
7
Inspect the following:
•  Fuel quality (e.g.: include water contamination, winter/summer blend)
•  Fuel line/fuel filter clogging
•  Intake-air system restriction
Are all items normal?
Yes
Go to the next step.
No
Service if necessary.
Repeat Step 7.
8
Примечание
•  Ignore DTC P0122 or P0123 while performing this test.
Disconnect the accelerator pedal position sensor connector.
Measure the voltage at the accelerator pedal position sensor connector VREF terminal (terminal 1) with the engine switch ON.
Specification
4.5—5.5 V
Is the voltage normal?
Yes
Go to the next step.
No
Inspect and repair or replace the following:
•  Instrument cluster
•  Wiring harness or connectors between accelerator pedal position sensor terminal 1 and instrument cluster terminal 2X
9
Connect the M-MDS to the DLC-2.
Turn the engine switch to the ON position.
Retrieve any DTC.
Are DTCs displayed?
Yes
DTC is displayed:
Go to the appropriate DTC test.
Communication error message is displayed:
Inspect for the following:
•  Open circuit between PCM control relay and PCM terminal 236 or 231
•  Open circuit between PCM control relay and PCM terminal 241
•  PCM control relay stuck open
•  Open or poor ground circuit (PCM terminal 307, 308 or 332)
•  Poorly connected vehicle body ground
No
No DTC is displayed:
Go to the next step.
10
Inspect glow system operation.
Is the glow system operation normal?
Yes
Go to the next step.
No
Repair or replace malfunctioning parts according to the glow system operation results.
11
Inspect fuel warmer system operation. Is the fuel warmer system operation normal?
Yes
Go to the next step.
No
Repair or replace malfunctioning parts according to the fuel warmer system operation inspection results.
12
Inspect for fuel leakage from the fuel pipe.
Is any fuel leakage found on the fuel pipe?
Yes
Repair or replace if necessary.
No
Go to the next step.
13
Visually inspect CKP sensor and teeth of pulse wheel.
Are the CKP sensor and the teeth of the pulse wheel normal?
Yes
Go to the next step.
No
Replace malfunctioning parts.
14
Measure gap between CKP sensor and teeth of pulse wheel.
Specification
1.5—2.5 mm {0.059—0.098 in}
Is the gap within the specification?
Yes
Go to the next step.
No
Adjust the CKP sensor position.
15
Visually inspect CMP sensor and teeth of pulse wheel.
Are the CMP sensor and the teeth of the pulse wheel normal?
Yes
Inspect the following PIDs:
•  ECT
•  RPM
If the PID value is not as specified, repair or replace malfunctioning parts.
If the PID value is normal, go to the next step.
No
Replace malfunctioning parts.
16
Inspect fuel pressure sensor.
Is the fuel pressure normal?
Yes
Go to the next step.
No
Replace the common rail.
17
Inspect the fuel metering valve.
Is the fuel metering valve normal?
Yes
Go to the next step.
No
Replace the fuel pump.
18
Is the engine compression correct?
Yes
Go to the next step.
No
Inspect for the following:
•  Damaged valve seat
•  Worn valve stem and valve guide
•  Worn or stuck piston ring
•  Worn piston, piston ring or cylinder
•  Improper valve timing
Service if necessary.
19
Inspect fuel injector.
Is the fuel injector normal?
Yes
Go to the next step.
No
Repair or replace if necessary.
20
Inspect EGR system operation.
Is the EGR system operation normal?
Yes
Remove and inspect the supply pump and common rail.
No
Repair or replace malfunctioning parts according to the EGR system operation results.
21
Verify test results.
•  If normal, return to the diagnostic index to service any additional symptoms. (See SYMPTOM DIAGNOSTIC INDEX [MZ-CD 1.6 (Y6)].)
•  If the malfunction remains, inspect related Service Information and perform repair or diagnosis.
―  If the vehicle is repaired, troubleshooting is completed.
―  If the vehicle is not repaired or additional diagnostic information is not available, replace the PCM. (See PCM REMOVAL/INSTALLATION [MZ-CD 1.6 (Y6)].)